Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5865XS (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 2133 Section 1. Section 256.146, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 28. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 3 17A that require an individual applying for an initial 4 administrator license to have been a teacher in this state 5 for at least five consecutive years prior to the date of 6 application, and to have taught at no more than two school 7 districts in this state during that five-year period, to attain 8 the initial administrator license. 9 NEW SUBSECTION . 29. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 10 that require an administrator with an initial administrator 11 license or a professional administrator license to maintain the 12 individualâs teacher license as a condition of maintaining the 13 initial administrator license or professional administrator 14 license. 15 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to all of the 16 following: 17 1. Applications for an initial administrator license that 18 are submitted to the board of educational examiners on or after 19 the effective date of this Act. 20 2. Initial administrator licenses and professional 21 administrator licenses that are granted by the board of 22 educational examiners on or after the effective date of this 23 Act. 24